Illinois, session 104th, HB1277.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 510-20.81 and 34-18.75 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.81)7    Sec. 10-20.81. Identification cards; suicide prevention 8and domestic violence information. 9    (a) Each school district that serves pupils in any of 10grades 6 through 12 and that issues an identification card to 11pupils in any of grades 6 through 12 shall provide contact 12information for the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline 13(988), the Crisis Text Line, and the Safe2Help Illinois 14helpline on the identification card. The contact information 15shall identify each helpline that may be contacted through 16text messaging. The contact information shall be included in 17the school's student handbook and also the student planner if 18a student planner is custom printed by the school for 19distribution to pupils in any of grades 6 through 12.20    (b) Each school district that serves pupils in any of 21grades 6 through 12 and that issues an identification card to 22pupils in any of grades 6 through 12 shall provide contact 23information for the National Domestic Violence Hotline on the   HB1277- 2 -LRB104 06166 LNS 16200 b1identification card, which shall include both the telephone 2number and the text message number of the hotline. The contact 3information shall be included in the school's student handbook 4and the student planner if a student planner is custom printed 5by the school for distribution to pupils in any grades 6 6through 12.7(Source: P.A. 102-416, eff. 7-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 8103-143, eff. 7-1-23.) 9    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.75)10    Sec. 34-18.75. Identification cards; suicide prevention 11and domestic violence information. 12    (a) If the school district issues an identification card 13to pupils in any of grades 6 through 12, the district shall 14provide contact information for the National Suicide 15Prevention Lifeline (988), the Crisis Text Line, and the 16Safe2Help Illinois helpline on the identification card. The 17contact information shall identify each helpline that may be 18contacted through text messaging. The contact information 19shall be included in the school's student handbook and also 20the student planner if a student planner is custom printed by 21the school for distribution to pupils in any of grades 6 22through 12.23    (b) If the school district issues an identification card 24to pupils in any of grades 6 through 12, the district shall 25provide contact information for the National Domestic Violence   HB1277- 3 -LRB104 06166 LNS 16200 b1Hotline on the identification card, which shall include both 2the telephone number and the text message number of the 3hotline. The contact information shall be included in the 4school's student handbook and the student planner if a student 5planner is custom printed by the school for distribution to 6pupils in any grades 6 through 12.7(Source: P.A. 102-416, eff. 7-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 8103-143, eff. 7-1-23.)